Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-238
Reciprocal licensure agreements; Board of Barber Examiners; powers.

The board may negotiate reciprocal agreements for licensure with any other state or country for licensed barbers and registered barber instructors.

Laws 1983, LB 87, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 226, § 12.